src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x2_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the pl
 +Pl+Nom:h%>eet     K ; !
 +Pl+Nom:h%>ee      Px ; !
 +Pl+Gen:h%>eitten   PxK ; !
 +Pl+Gen:h%>ejen   PxK ; !
 +Pl+Par:h%>ej^A   PxK ; !
 +Pl+Par:h%>eit^A   PxK ; !
 +Pl+Ill:h%>ei2shii     n_PxK ; !
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hei2shii     n_PxK ; 
 +Pl+Ine:h%>ei2ss^A   PxK ; ! liikheissä !
 +Pl+Ine:^HMET2%>hei2ss^A   PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:h%>ei2st^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä !
 +Pl+Ela:^HMET2%>hei2st^A   PxK ; 
 +Pl+All:h%>ei2le    PxxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä!
 +Pl+All:^HMET2%>hei2le    PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:h%>ei2l^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä!
 +Pl+Ade:^HMET2%>hei2l^A    PxK ; 
 +Pl+Abl:h%>ei2lt^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä!
 +Pl+Abl:^HMET2%>hei2lt^A    PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:h%>ei2 TRA ; !
 +Pl+Tra:^HMET2%>hei2 TRA ;
 +Pl+Ess:h%>ei2n^A PxK ; !
 +Pl+Ess:^HMET2%>hei2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:h%>ei2tt^A PxK ; !
 +Pl+Abe:^HMET2%>hei2tt^A PxK ;


!LEXICON n2_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  urvakke etc, n2-ord med -lle/-lla 
 !+N: x2_odd ;
 !+N+Nom: R ;
 !+N+Gen:he%>en R ;

!LEXICON x2_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** splits in sg and pl
 !x2_odd_sg ;
 !x2_odd_pl ;

!LEXICON x2_odd_sg ! urvakke etc, n2-ord med -lle/-lla 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the sg
 !+Sg+Nom:^WG      KK ; ! eläke
 !+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:^WGt      KK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Gen:^WGh%>een    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>heen    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Par:^WG%>tt^A PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ill:^WGh%>eeshee     n_PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>heeshee     n_PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ine:^WGh%>eess^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>heess^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ela:^WGh%>eest^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ela:^HMET2%>heest^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+All:^WGh%>eele    PxxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+All:^HMET2%>heele    PxxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ade:^WGh%>eel^A    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ade:^HMET2%>heel^A    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Abl:^WGh%>eelt^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Abl:^HMET2%>heelt^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Tra:^WGh%>ee TRA ;
 !+Sg+Tra:^HMET2%>hee TRA ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ess:^WGh%>een^A PxK ;
 !+Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>heen^A PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;

!LEXICON x2_odd_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the pl
 !+Pl+Nom:^WGh%>eet     K ;
 !+Pl+Nom:^WGh%>ee      Px ;
 !+Pl+Gen:^WGh%>eitten   PxK ;
 !+Pl+Gen:^WGh%>ejen   PxK ;
 !+Pl+Par:^WGh%>ej^A   PxK ;
 !+Pl+Ill:%>e     n_PxK ; ! liikheen, säkheen
 !+Pl+Ine:%>ess^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä
 !+Pl+Ela:%>est^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä
 !+Pl+Ade:%>ei2le    PxxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä
 !+Pl+All:%>ei2l^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä
 !+Pl+Abl:%>ei2lt^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä
 !+Pl+Tra:%>ei2 TRA ;
 !+Pl+Ess:%>ei2n^A PxK ;
 !+Pl+Abe:%>ei2tt^A PxK ;



LEXICON n3 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  odd-syllabic: kanava
 +N: x3 ;
 +N+Nom:^E2I R ;
 +N+Gen:^WG%>n R ;

LEXICON n3_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  haalarit
 +N: x3_pl ;

LEXICON x3
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 x3_sg ;
 x3_pl ;

LEXICON x3_oblique
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
x3_oblique_sg ;
x3_pl ;

LEXICON x3_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^E2I       PxK ;
 x3_oblique_sg ;

LEXICON x3_oblique_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Gen:^WG%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Par+Err/Orth:%>t^A PxK ; !asiata
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:^WG%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;
 +Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;

LEXICON x3_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>i2tten PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:%>i2t^A PxK ; !asioita
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:^WG%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^WG%>i2lle PxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^WG%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:%>i2 TRA ;
 +Pl+Ess:%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:%>i2tt^A PxK ;

LEXICON 3nc ! jiddisch
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xnc ;

LEXICON xnc
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom: PxK ;      ! jiddisch
 :i x3_oblique_sg ; ! jiddischin
  x3_pl ;         ! jiddischit
 +Pl+Ill:i^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;       ! 



!! #### The i>e-family; kivi, kieli, käsi, lumi etc

LEXICON n4
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kivi, stem kive
 +N: x4 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Sg+Nom:       Px ; ! kivensä
 +N+Sg+Par:%>^A   PxK ; ! kiveä
 +N+Nom:^E2I      R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n    R ;

LEXICON x4
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  veri
x4_sg ;
x4_pl ;

LEXICON n4_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N: x4_pl ;

LEXICON x4_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** shared lexica for n4, n5, n5_lumi/loimi/lapsi EXCEPT SgNom, SgPar
+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n     PxK ; ! veren
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:^WG%>le PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;
 +Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK;

LEXICON x4_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^E2I%>tten PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^E2Ie%>n PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:^E2I%>^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^WG^E2I%>ss^A PxK ; !NY ändr neråt
 +Pl+Ela:^WG^E2I%>st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^WG^E2I%>le PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG^E2I%>l^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^WG^E2I%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^E2I%>n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:^WG^E2I%> TRA ;
 +Pl+Abe:^E2I%>tt^A PxK;


LEXICON n5
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kieli, stem kiele
 +N: x5 ;
 !+N: x4 ;
 !+N+Sg+Nom:^E2I       PxK ; ! kieli
 !+N+Sg+Par:%>t^A      PxK ; ! kieltä
 !+N+Nom:^E2I R ;
 !+N+Gen:^WG%>n R ;

 LEXICON x5
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kieli, stem kiele
 x4 ;
 +Sg+Nom:^E2I       PxK ; ! kieli
 +Sg+Par:%>t^A      PxK ; ! kieltä
 +Nom:^E2I R ;
 +Gen:^WG%>n R ;

LEXICON n5_lumi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** lumi, stem lu
 +N:me x4 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:mi       PxK ; ! lumi
 +N+Sg+Par:ne%>t^A      PxK ; ! lunta
 +N+Nom:mi R ;
 +N+Gen:me%>n R ;

LEXICON n5_loimi 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** loimi, stem loi, som n5_lumi PLUS partitiv loimea
n5_lumi ;
+N+Sg+Par:me%>^A      PxK ; ! loimea


LEXICON n5_vuosi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** vuosi> vuoessa/vuessa, stem ELLER vu
 +N+Nom:osi R ;
 +N:ote x5_kasi ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:osi       PxK ; ! vuosi
 +N+Sg+Par:ot%>t^A      PxK ; ! vuotta
 +N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ess^A PxK ; !
 +N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:o%>n^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:^WG%>e TRA ;

LEXICON n5_kasi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** käsi, stem kä
 +N:te x5_kasi ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:si       PxK ; ! käsi
 +N+Sg+Par:t%>t^A      PxK ; ! kättä
 +N+Nom:si R ;
 +N+Gen:e%>n R ;

LEXICON n5_kasi_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  continuation for kasi_pl
+N: x5_kasi_pl ;

LEXICON x5_kasi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  veri
x4_sg ;
x5_kasi_pl ;

LEXICON x5_kasi_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^E2I%>tten PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^E2Ie%>n PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:^E2I%>^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^E2I^WG%>ss^A PxK ; !NY ändr neråt
 +Pl+Ela:^E2I^WG%>st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^E2I^WG%>le PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^E2I^WG%>l^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^E2I^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^E2I%>n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:^E2I^WG%> TRA ;
 +Pl+Abe:^E2I%>tt^A PxK;


LEXICON n5_lapsi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Sg+Nom:psi R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:pse%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Nom:psi       PxK ; ! lapsi
+N+Sg+Gen:pse%>n     PxK ; ! lapsen
+N+Sg+Par:s%>t^A      PxK ; ! lasta
+N+Sg+Ill:ps%>hee n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ine:pse%>ss^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ela:pse%>st^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+All:pse%>le PxxK ;
+N+Sg+Ade:pse%>l^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Abl:pse%>lt^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ess:pse%>n^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Tra:pse TRA ;
+N+Sg+Abe:pse%>tt^A PxK ;

+N+Pl+Nom:pse%>t PxK ;
+N+Pl+Gen:s%>ten PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:ps%>i^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:ps%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ine:ps%>i2ss^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ela:ps%>ist^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:ps%>ile PxxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:ps%>il^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:ps%>ilt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ess:ps%>in^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:psi TRA ;
+N+Pl+Abe:ps%>itt^A PxK ;

LEXICON n5_ie
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for 2-syll ordinary nouns ending with -i; malmi, äiti, poiting to x5_i
 +N: x5_i ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:i   PxK ; 
 +N+Nom:i R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:i^WG%>n R ;
 +N+Pl+Par:i%>^A PxK ; !malmia, äitiä 

LEXICON n5_takki
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** same as n5_ie except Pl+Part: takki>takkeja 
 +N: x5_i ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:i   PxK ; 
 +N+Nom:i R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:i^WG%>n R ;
 +N+Pl+Par:ej%>^A PxK ; !takkeja
