src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
lipia:lipia n3 ;
vuotkinlaattia:vuotkinlaattia n3 ;
vainaja:vainaja n3 ;
voittaja:voittaja n3 ;
sija:sija n3 ;
kahvinsakka:kahvinsakka n3 ;
juottovasikka:juottovasikka n3 ;
upukka:upukka n3 ;
poikalapsi:poika#la n5_lapsi ;
likkalapsi:likka#la n5_lapsi ;
jalkalapsi:jalka#la n5_lapsi ;
rintalapsi:rinta#la n5_lapsi ;
kusilapsi:kusi#la n5_lapsi ;
kasvattilapsi:kasvatti#la n5_lapsi ;
jumalanlapsi:jumalan#la n5_lapsi ;
lapsenlapsi:lapsen#la n5_lapsi ;
orpolapsi:orpo#la n5_lapsi ;
ottolapsi:otto#la n5_lapsi ;
pikkulapsi:pikku#la n5_lapsi ;
imulapsi:imu#la n5_lapsi ;
nisälapsi:nisä#la n5_lapsi ;
kevätmarkkinat:kevät#markkina n3_pl ;
pihet:pihe n4_pl ;
pajapihet:pajapihe n4_pl ;
kirsilohi:kirsi#lohe n5 ;
kesälohi:kesä#lohe n5 ;
jouhi:jouhe n5 ;
purjet:purje n4_pl ;
koijunkylki:koijun#kylke n4 ;
viinahenki:viina#henke n4 ;
poski:poske n4 ;
kirkonväki:kirkon#väke n4 ;
paskakieli:paska#kiele n5 ;
pitkäkieli:pitkä#kiele n5 ;
suupieli:suu#piele n5 ;
karepuoli:kare#puole n5 ;
miehempuoli:miehem#puole n5 ;
veistopuoli:veisto#puole n5 ;
yläpuoli:ylä#puole n5 ;
kuusuoli:kuu#suole n5 ;
tuuli:tuule n5 ;
lihaliemi:liha#lie n5_loimi ;
makkaraliemi:makkara#lie n5_loimi ;
vasikanliemi:vasikan#lie n5_loimi ;
kalanliemi:kalan#lie n5_loimi ;
iloliemi:ilo#lie n5_loimi ;
pottuliemi:pottu#lie n5_loimi ;
niemi:nie n5_loimi ;
maaniemi:maa#nie n5_loimi ;
villaloimi:villa#loi n5_loimi ;
tärkkiloimi:tärkki#loi n5_loimi ;
kankhaanloimi:kankhaan#loi n5_loimi ;
ostoloimi:osto#loi n5_loimi ;
lähetystoimi:lähetys#toi n5_loimi ;
klasihelmi:klasi#helme n4 ;
lumi:lu n5_lumi ;
pohjalumi:pohja#lu n5_lumi ;
vuotatelumi:vuotate#lu n5_lumi ;
vitilumi:viti#lu n5_lumi ;
valinkolumi:valinko#lu n5_lumi ;
pakkaslumi:pakkas#lu n5_lumi ;
mätälumi:mätä#lu n5_lumi ;
nätälumi:nätä#lu n5_lumi ;
höttölumi:höttö#lu n5_lumi ;
vasikanonni:vasikan#onne n4 ;
valeuni:vale#une n5 ;
peltosiipi:pelto#siipe n4 ;
maatusaari:maatu#saare n4 ;
kuunvuoret:kuun#vuore n4_pl ;
karakuusi:kara#kuuse n4 ;
jalkavesi:jalka#ve n5_kasi ;
valtavesi:valta#ve n5_kasi ;
juevesi:jue#ve n5_kasi ;
ylivesi:yli#ve n5_kasi ;
lahtivesi:lahti#ve n5_kasi ;
painovesi:paino#ve n5_kasi ;
pottuvesi:pottu#ve n5_kasi ;
ehontähti:ehon#tähte n4 ;
vastakynsi:vasta#kyn n5_kasi ;
viljavuosi:vilja#vu n5_vuosi ;
kuolemavuosi:kuolema#vu n5_vuosi ;
naimavuosi:naima#vu n5_vuosi ;
ohravuosi:ohra#vu n5_vuosi ;
oravavuosi:orava#vu n5_vuosi ;
murevuosi:mure#vu n5_vuosi ;
uusivuosi:uusi#vu n5_vuosi ;
katovuosi:kato#vu n5_vuosi ;
karkausvuosi:karkaus#vu n5_vuosi ;
ituvuosi:itu#vu n5_vuosi ;
ikävuosi:ikä#vu n5_vuosi ;
nöyrävuosi:nöyrä#vu n5_vuosi ;
jyvävuosi:jyvä#vu n5_vuosi ;
nokkavarsi:nokka#var n5_kasi ;
saapasvarsi:saapas#var n5_kasi ;
virsi:vir n5_kasi ;
kuukausi:kuu#kau n5_kasi ;
lepäyskivi:lepäys#kive n4 ;
puunpolvi:puun#polve n4 ;
poikkijärvi:poikki#järve n4 ;
jiddisch:jiddisch 3nc ;
lehmämpaskalakki:lehmämpaskalakk n5_takki ;
liuskalakki:liuska#lakk n5_takki ;
kakilakki:kaki#lakk n5_takki ;
tykkilakki:tykki#lakk n5_takki ;
sääskilakki:sääski#lakk n5_takki ;
pirrilakki:pirri#lakk n5_takki ;
lapsenlakki:lapsen#lakk n5_takki ;
kirkkolakki:kirkko#lakk n5_takki ;
lääppälakki:lääppä#lakk n5_takki ;
tasapäälakki:tasapää#lakk n5_takki ;
lapintakki:lapin#takk n5_takki ;
jekkutakki:jekku#takk n5_takki ;
imnenteerinki:imnenteerinki n3 ;
kestingit:kestinki n3_pl ;
leivinuuni:leivin#uun n5_ie ;
venäjänkuppi:venäjänkupp n5_ie ;
unilukkari:unilukkari n3 ;
haalarit:haalari n3_pl ;
kelkkapari:kelkkapar n5_ie ;
patsarit:patsari n3_pl ;
kanttari:kanttari n3 ;
pauarit:pauari n3_pl ;
kekkerit:kekkeri n3_pl ;
kahvikekkerit:kahvi#kekkeri n3_pl ;
kinkerit:kinkeri n3_pl ;
lukukinkerit:luku#kinkeri n3_pl ;
rötterit:rötteri n3_pl ;
potusit:potusi n3_pl ;
mastovahti:masto#vaht n5_ie ;
lainkäynti:lain#käynt n5_ie ;
tietisti:tietist n5_ie ;
dieetti:dieett n5_ie ;
maltti:maltt n5_ie ;
pikkukontti:pikkukontt n5_ie ;
kulosortti:kulosortt n5_ie ;
kuivatauti:kuivataut n5_ie ;
puustaavi:puustaav n5_ie ;
tuhkarautio:tuhkarautio n3 ;
kasuvet:kasuve n5_kasi_pl ;
käräjät:käräjä n3_pl ;
käärmheenkäräjät:käärmheen#käräjä n3_pl ;
keväkkö:keväkkö n3 ;
